Utah statutes.
58-73-701.   Persons immune from liability.
(1)  Employees of the division, members of the board or its committees, and
professional consultants serving the division or the board, are not subject to
civil damages, when acting under the authority of this chapter for any act or
omission performed in good faith within the scope of their functions as an
employee of the division or member of the board.
(2)  Employees, board members, committee members, and professional consultants
are indemnified by the state.  The state has full responsibility for providing
legal and financial protection for employees, board members, committee
members, and consultants to the board or division.
(3)  Nothing in this section may be construed to adversely limit any provision
of Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah.
